Massachusetts, session 194th, S1898.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The town administrator of the town of Plainville may appoint retired police 
officers of the town of Plainville as special police officers to perform police details or other 
police duties arising from police details or during the course of police detail work, whether or not 
related to the detail work. The retired police officer shall have been a regular, full-time police 
officer who retired in good standing and based on superannuation. A special police officer 
appointed pursuant to this act shall not be subject to the maximum age restrictions for police 
officers set forth in chapter 32 of the General Laws, but shall not be eligible to serve as a special 
police officer once the special police officer has reached the age of 70. No further deductions 
shall be made from the regular compensation of any special police officers appointed pursuant to 

of 4 10 this act under Chapter 32 of the General Laws for any service performed subsequent to their 
reaching the age of 65.  
SECTION 2. Prior to appointment as a special police officer pursuant to this act, a retired 
police officer shall: (i) pass a medical examination conducted by a physician selected by the 
chief of police of the town of Plainville to determine whether the retired police officer is capable 
of performing the essential duties of a special police officer; and (ii) provide proof of that 
passage to the chief of police. Additional post-appointment fitness for duty examinations may be 
required of a special police officer by the chief of police if, in the chief of police's sole discretion, 
a question as to that special police officer's fitness for duty has arisen. The cost of all medical 
examinations pursuant to this section shall be borne by the retired or special police officer.  
SECTION 3. A special police officer appointed pursuant to this act shall not be subject to 
chapter 31, sections 98A and 111F of chapter 41 or chapter 150E of the General Laws. A special 
police officer may be required by the chief of police, as a condition of employment, to purchase 
an insurance policy that indemnifies the town of Plainville against workers' compensation costs 
in the event that the special police officer is injured while performing duties of a special police 
officer.  
SECTION 4. A special police officer appointed pursuant to this act shall be subject to the 
town policies, procedures, rules and regulations of the police department of the town of 
Plainville including, but not limited to, those policies, procedures, rules and regulations 
governing training, equipment, uniforms, certifications or any other restrictions or requirements 
related to employment as a special police officer. A special police officer appointed under this 
act shall comply with all requirements of chapter 6E of the General Laws, including: (i) 

of 4 32 maintaining certification and good standing with the Massachusetts Peace Officer Standards and 
Training Commission; and (ii) complying with all annual in-service and other training 
requirements mandated by the municipal police training committee.  
SECTION 5. A special police officer of the town of Plainville, while performing the 
duties described in this act, shall have the same power of arrest and authority to perform other 
police functions as a full-time, regular police officer of the town of Plainville.  
SECTION 6. A special police officer shall be appointed annually for a term of 1 year 
commencing on July 1, but shall serve at the pleasure of the town of Plainville and may be 
suspended or removed from the appointment by the town administrator at any time. In the case 
of removal, the special police officer shall be provided with 14 days written notice before 
removal.  
SECTION 7. The chief of police of the town of Plainville may restrict the type of detail 
assignments that special police officers may work. The cost of all training equipment and 
uniforms shall be borne by the special police officer except as otherwise determined by the chief 
of police.  
SECTION 8. Special police officers of the town of Plainville shall be sworn before the 
clerk of the town of Plainville, who shall keep record of all appointments and expirations of 
appointments.  
SECTION 9. Special police officers appointed pursuant to this act shall be eligible for 
indemnification pursuant to section 100 of chapter 41 of the General Laws. Special police 
officers shall not be subject to sections 85H or 85H½ of chapter 32 of the General Laws and 
shall not be eligible for any benefits pursuant to said sections 85H or 85H½ of said chapter 32.  

of 4 54  SECTION 10. The assignment of a special police officer pursuant to this act to a police 
detail or other duties shall be at the discretion of the chief of police of the town of Plainville.  
SECTION 11. A special police officer appointed pursuant to this act shall be subject to 
the limitations on hours worked and earnings restrictions in section 91 of chapter 32 of the 
General Laws.  
SECTION 12. This act shall take effect upon its passage.